Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 3. Change of Irrigation District to Irrigation and Public Power District

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-7-850.
Irrigation district may assume status of public power district.

Any irrigation district heretofore organized and existing under and by virtue of the provisions of chapter 2, Session Laws of Wyoming, Special Session, 1920, as amended, codified and compiled in W.S.

41-7-101

through

41-7-603

[§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

], as now amended, shall have and receive all of the rights, powers and authority which it would have and enjoy if it had been created and formed as a public power district under the provisions of chapter 137, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1937, as amended, codified and compiled in W.S.

41-7-801

through

41-7-835

, and any existing amendments thereof, by taking proceedings in the manner as hereinafter set forth and provided.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.1.

§ 41-7-851.
Resolution of commissioners.

Whenever the commissioners of any duly organized and existing irrigation district, heretofore organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming, shall determine by a majority vote thereof that it is or would be beneficial to and for the best interest of the landowners and entrymen therein either to use any or a part of its irrigation works theretofore constructed as a part of the necessary works required for the construction and development of a complete electric power plant or system for the production, distribution and sale of electric energy, or that it is for the best interest of the landowners and entrymen in said district that it should add thereto or to construct a complete new system of works for the development, sale and distribution of electric energy they may adopt and approve an appropriate resolution stating their determination thereof.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.2.

§ 41-7-852.
Report made to district court; contents.

Upon the adoption of such a resolution, the said commissioners shall file an appropriate report with the district court of the county having jurisdiction of said irrigation district proceeding, stating in general the desirability of said district to have and obtain the rights, powers and authority of an irrigation and public power district, which report shall include:

The name of the proposed irrigation and public power district to include the words “public power” therein;

The general necessity for the proposed works;

The object and purpose of the system proposed to be constructed together with a general description thereof;

A general prayer for an order to obtain all the rights, powers and authority of a “public power district”.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-853.
Hearing on proposal.

Upon such petition being filed the court or judge thereof shall make an order fixing a time and place of hearing thereon and require notice of the time and place of such hearing to be given thereon by the clerk of said court.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.4.

§ 41-7-854.
Notice of hearing; publication.

The clerk of said court shall give notice of the filing of said petition and of the time and place of hearing thereon to any and all persons interested therein by publishing a copy of said order at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in each county within which any of the lands of the said irrigation district is situated. If there be no newspaper in any such county, such notice may be published in a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.5.

§ 41-7-855.
Notice of hearing; contents.

Such notice shall disclose:

In what court said petition is filed;

A general description of the proposed work;

The name proposed for said combined irrigation and public power district;

The time and place fixed by the court, when and where the hearing on said petition will be heard;

It shall also require all persons interested to appear at the time and place stated, then and there to show cause why said irrigation district should not receive and have the rights, powers and authority of a public power district.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.6.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-856.
Order of court authorizing change.

If the court at the hearing so petitioned for, noticed, and held, shall decide the issues in favor of the petitioners, the court shall enter an order approving and confirming the petition, amend the name of said irrigation district to show that it is also a public power district, and authorize said district to have and receive all of the rights, powers and authority of a “public power district” in addition to all of the rights, powers and authority given to and enjoyed by it as an irrigation district under the laws of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.7.

§ 41-7-857.
Submission of proposal to vote of landowners and entrymen.

In the event the board of commissioners by a majority vote, or the court by an appropriate order, shall request or determine that a vote should be had of the landowners and entrymen within the district on the question of whether or not the said irrigation district should acquire the rights, powers and authority of a “public power district”, then the matter shall be submitted to the landowners and entrymen of the district at either a regular or special election, at a time and place or places, to be designated by the commissioners of the district under the order of the court to be held under the same rules and in the same manner as elections are held for commissioners within an irrigation district.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.8.

§ 41-7-858.
Effect of vote on court.

In the event such an election be had the result thereof shall be certified to the court and shall be advisory and determinative of the final order to be presented on the question of whether or not said irrigation district should receive all of the rights, powers and authority of a public power district.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.9.

§ 41-7-859.
Court order vests powers.

Upon the entry of an order of the court authorizing or approving the receipt by an existing irrigation district of the rights, powers and authority of a public power district, then it shall have and receive all of said rights, powers and authority as are given and granted to a public power district by the provisions of chapter 123, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1937 and the amendments thereof as now codified and compiled in W.S.

41-7-101

through

41-7-1006

and any existing amendments thereof.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.10.

§ 41-7-860.
Construction and application of Public Irrigation and Power District Law.

In applying and adapting the public power district law to the existing irrigation district law, organization and procedures, the Public Irrigation and Power District Law [§§

41-7-801

through

41-7-819

] of the state of Wyoming as aforesaid shall be and the same is hereby construed in the following specific manner, when applied to a regularly organized irrigation district which assumes and receives the rights, powers and authority of a “public power district”, as follows, to wit:

The word “board” shall mean the board of commissioners of the existing irrigation district;

Whenever the phrase, “members of the board of directors” appears in the existing Public Irrigation and Power District Law, the same shall be read as “members of the board of commissioners”;

The requirements and limitations as to number, terms of office, vacancies, election, qualifications, and compensation of commissioners shall be governed by the Irrigation District Law [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

] of the state of Wyoming and not by the Public Irrigation and Power District Law of the state.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.11.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-861.
Irrigation and power funds to be kept in separate accounts.

The board of commissioners of any irrigation district which shall have and receive the rights, powers and authority of a public power district under and pursuant to the provisions of this act [§§

41-7-850

through

41-7-865

], shall keep separate accounts for all money received from assessments for construction and for the operation and maintenance of the irrigation works portion thereof from the funds received or accumulated from the power works and system thereof; and none of said funds shall ever be commingled or diverted from their proper uses as fixed by law.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.12.

§ 41-7-862.
Different laws to apply to additions to irrigation works and power works.

In the construction of additional irrigation works or features or of needed or required works or features for the power portion of said project, all irrigation works thereof shall be constructed, built and financed under the provisions of the Irrigation District Law [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

] of the state of Wyoming and the power works and system shall be built, financed and paid for following the public power district portion of the Wyoming law.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.13.

§ 41-7-863.
Report of proposed construction to court; apportionment of irrigation and power costs.

Prior to the starting of any construction work thereon, the commissioners shall report the purpose, whether for irrigation or power for which any of said works is to be constructed; and shall recommend to the court an equitable and fair division and distribution of the cost thereof as between irrigation and power; and the court upon the hearing for the authorization thereof, shall fix and determine the proportionate amount as between the irrigation and power works or features which shall be beneficial and chargeable to the irrigation portion and the power portion thereof and the order of the court thereon shall be determinative and final thereon.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.14.

§ 41-7-864.
Rights and powers preserved.

An irrigation district receiving the rights, power and authority of a public power district as aforesaid, shall not lose any of its rights and powers under and by virtue of the provisions of chapter 2, Session Laws of Wyoming, Special Session, 1920, as amended, codified and compiled in W.S.

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

, as now amended.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.15; Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “41-7-415” for “41-7-603.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

§ 41-7-865.
Liberal construction; restrictions; regulation by public service commission.

This act [§§

41-7-850

through

41-7-865

] shall be construed liberally for the purpose of making it possible for irrigation districts by the development and sale of hydroelectric energy and power through the construction or purchase of necessary and required properties and works to create sufficient income to make said works in connection with their irrigation works a feasible project to save, conserve and preserve their full water rights under the laws of Wyoming.

The generation of electric energy and power under the provisions of this act and under the provisions of chapter 137, Session Laws of Wyoming 1937, as amended, codified and compiled in W.S.

41-7-801

through

41-7-835

, shall be restricted to the generation of hydroelectric energy and power for wholesale transmission and sale and such irrigation and public power districts established under the provisions of said acts shall be subject to the regulations of the public service commission of Wyoming in the establishment of wholesale rates and transmission facilities, applicable to any other public utility generating electric energy and power for wholesale transmission and sale.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 48, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.16.